Hawaii statutes.
§180-4 Creation of soil and water
conservation districts; petition. Occupiers of land representing a total
of twenty-five or more votes lying within an area proposed to be organized into
a district may file a petition with the department of land and natural
resources asking that the district be organized. The department shall
prescribe the form of the petitions, which shall state:

(1) The proposed name of the district, and

(2) A general description of the area proposed to be
organized as a district.

Where more than one petition is filed covering
parts of the same territory, the department may consolidate the petitions. The
area of a district need not be contiguous but shall not include any of the area
of any other district. [L 1947, c 191, pt of §5; RL 1955, §28-7; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 53, §1 and c 132, §2; am L 1967, c 145, §§1, 2; HRS
§180-4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next